California statutes. Corporations Code
(A) The expiration of the statute of limitations applicable to the cause of action.

(B) Four years after the effective date of the dissolution of the corporation.

(3) As a matter of procedure only, and not for purposes of determining
 liability, persons to whom assets of a dissolved corporation are distributed may be sued in the name of the corporation upon any cause of action against the corporation. This section does not affect the rights of the corporation or its creditors under Section 2009, or the rights, if any, of creditors under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act, which may arise against persons to whom those assets are distributed.

(4) This subdivision applies to corporations dissolved on or after January 1, 2000. Corporations dissolved prior to that date are subject to the law in effect prior to that date.

(b) Summons or other process against the corporation may be served by delivering a copy thereof to an officer, director, or person having charge of its assets or, if none of these persons can be found, to any agent upon whom process might be served at the time of dissolution. If none of those
 persons can be found with due diligence and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, then the court may make an order that summons or other process be served upon the dissolved corporation by personally delivering a copy thereof, together with a copy of the order, to the Secretary of State or an assistant or deputy secretary of state, with an additional copy of the summons or other process and order being delivered to the Attorney General in the case of a corporation that at the commencement of the dissolution proceedings held assets in charitable trust. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State, or in the case of a corporation that at the commencement of the dissolution proceedings held assets in charitable trust, upon the 10th day after the later of delivery of process to the Secretary of State or Attorney General.

(c) The corporation shall survive
 and continue to exist indefinitely for the purpose of being sued in any quiet title action. Any judgment rendered in that action shall bind each of its members or other persons having any equity or other interest in the corporation, to the extent of their interest therein, and that action shall have the same force and effect as an action brought under the provisions of Sections 410.50 and 410.60 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Service of summons or other process in that action may be made as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or as provided in subdivision (b).

(d) Upon receipt of that process and the fee therefor, the Secretary of State forthwith shall give notice to the corporation as provided in Section 1702.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 30.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8724.

Without the approval of 100 percent of the members, any contrary provision in this part or the articles or bylaws notwithstanding, so long as there is any lot, parcel, area, apartment, or unit for which an owners’ association, created in connection with any of the forms of development referred to in Section 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code, is obligated to provide management, maintenance, preservation, or control, the following shall apply:

(a) The owners’ association or any person acting on its behalf shall not do either of the following:

(1) Transfer all or substantially all of its assets.

(2) File a certificate of dissolution.

(b) No court shall enter an order declaring the owners’ association duly wound up and dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Crimes and Penalties [8810. - 8817.]

8810.

(a) Upon the failure of a corporation to file the statement required by Section 8210, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice of such delinquency to the corporation. The notice shall also contain information concerning the application of this section, and advise the corporation of the penalty imposed by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for failure to timely file the required statement after notice of delinquency has been provided by the Secretary of State. If, within 60 days after providing notice of the delinquency, a statement pursuant to Section 8210 has not been filed by the corporation, the Secretary of State shall certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon certification
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall assess against the corporation a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The penalty herein provided shall not apply to a corporation which on or prior to the date of certification pursuant to subdivision (a) has dissolved, has converted to another type of business entity, or has been merged into another corporation or other business entity.

(d) The penalty herein provided shall not apply and the Secretary of State need not provide a notice of the delinquency to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been suspended by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the last day of the filing period pursuant to Section 8210. The Secretary of
 State need not provide notice of the filing requirement pursuant to Section 8210, to a corporation the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of which have been so suspended by the Franchise Tax Board on or prior to, and remain suspended on, the day the Secretary of State prepares the notice for sending.

(e) If, after certification pursuant to subdivision (a) the Secretary of State finds the required statement was filed before the expiration of the 60-day period after providing the notice of delinquency, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board shall then promptly abate any penalty assessed against the corporation pursuant to Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) If the Secretary of State determines that the failure of a corporation to file a statement required by Section 8210 is
 excusable because of reasonable cause or unusual circumstances which justify the failure, the Secretary of State may waive the penalty imposed by this section and by Section 19141 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, in which case the Secretary of State shall not certify the name of the corporation to the Franchise Tax Board, or if already certified, the Secretary of State shall promptly decertify the name of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 17.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8811.

Any promoter, director, or officer of a corporation who knowingly and willfully issues or consents to the issuance of memberships or membership certificates with intent to defraud present or future members or creditors is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in county jail for not more than one year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8812.

Any director of any corporation who concurs in any vote or act of the directors of the corporation or any of them, knowingly and with dishonest or fraudulent purpose, to make any distribution of assets, except in the case and in the manner allowed by this part, either with the design of defrauding creditors or members or of giving a false appearance to the value of the membership and thereby defrauding purchasers is guilty of a crime. Each such crime is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 42.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.

(a) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime if such director or officer knowingly concurs in making or publishing, either generally or privately, to members or other persons (1) any materially false report or statement as to the financial condition of the corporation, or (2) any willfully or fraudulently exaggerated report, prospectus, account or statement of operations, financial condition or prospects, or (3) any other paper intended to give, and having a tendency to give, a membership in such corporation a greater or lesser value than it really possesses.

(b) Every director or officer of any corporation is guilty of a crime who refuses to make or direct to be made any book entry or the posting of any notice required by law in the manner required by law.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of this section shall be punishable by imprisonment in state prison or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8814.

(a) Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, who knowingly receives or acquires possession of any property of the corporation, otherwise than in payment of a just demand, and, with intent to defraud, omits to make, or to cause or direct to be made, a full and true entry thereof in the books or accounts of the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(b) Every director, officer, agent or member of any corporation who, with intent to defraud, destroys, alters, mutilates or falsifies any of the books, papers, writings or securities belonging to the corporation or makes or concurs in omitting to make any material entry in any book of accounts or other record or document kept by the corporation is guilty of a crime.

(c) Each crime specified in this section is punishable by imprisonment in state prison, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.

Every director, officer or agent of any corporation, or any person proposing to organize such a corporation who knowingly exhibits any false, forged or altered book, paper, voucher, security or other instrument of evidence to any public officer or board authorized by law to examine the organization of such corporation or to investigate its affairs, with intent to deceive such officer or board in respect thereto, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 43.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

8816.

Every person who, without being authorized so to do, subscribes the name of another to or inserts the name of another in any prospectus, circular or other advertisement or announcement of any corporation, whether existing or intended to be formed, with intent to permit the document to be published and thereby to lead persons to believe that the person whose name is so subscribed is an officer, agent or promoter of such corporation, when in fact no such relationship exists to the knowledge of such person, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8817.

Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Foreign Corporations [8910. - 8910.]

8910.

Foreign corporations transacting intrastate business shall comply with Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1, except as to matters specifically otherwise provided for in this part and except that Section 2115 shall not be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 187, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 4. NONPROFIT RELIGIOUS CORPORATIONS [9110. - 9690.]



  CHAPTER 1. Organization and Bylaws [9110. - 9160.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title and Purposes [9110. - 9111.]

9110.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Nonprofit Religious Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9111.

Subject to any other provision of law of this state applying to the particular class of corporation or line of activity, a corporation may be formed under this part primarily or exclusively for any religious purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation [9120. - 9122.]

9120.

(a) One or more persons may form a corporation under this part by executing and filing articles of incorporation.

(b) If initial directors are named in the articles, each director named in the articles shall sign and acknowledge the articles; if initial directors are not named in the articles, the articles shall be signed by one or more persons who thereupon are the incorporators of the corporation.

(c) The corporate existence begins upon the filing of the articles and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

9121.

(a) In the case of an existing unincorporated association, the association may change its status to that of a corporation upon a proper authorization for such by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures. 

(b) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles pursuant to Section 9130, the articles in the case of an incorporation authorized by subdivision (a) shall set forth that an existing unincorporated association, stating its name, is being incorporated by the filing of the articles.

(c) The articles filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a verified statement of any two officers or governing board members of the association stating that the incorporation of the association by means of the articles to which the verified statement is attached has been approved by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(d) Upon the change of status of an unincorporated association to a corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the property of the association becomes the property of the corporation and the members of the association who had any voting rights of the type referred to in Section 5056 become members of the corporation. 

(e) The filing for records in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the association is located of a copy of the articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section, certified by the Secretary of State, shall evidence record ownership in the corporation of all interests of the association in and to the real property located in that county.

(f) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the association shall be preserved unimpaired. Any action or proceeding pending by or against the unincorporated association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the corporation, or the corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(g) If a corporation is organized by a person who is or was an officer, director or member of an unincorporated association and such corporation is not organized pursuant to subdivision (a), the unincorporated association may continue to use its name and the corporation may not use a name which is the same as or similar to the name of the unincorporated association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

9122.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles setting forth a name in which “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” or related words appear, unless the certificate of approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is attached thereto.

(b) The name of a corporation shall not be a name that the Secretary of State determines is likely to mislead the public and shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from all of the following:

(1) The name of any corporation.

(2) The name of any foreign corporation authorized to transact
 intrastate business in this state.

(3) Each name that is under reservation pursuant to this title.

(4) The name of a foreign corporation that has registered its name pursuant to Section 2101.

(5) An alternate name of a foreign corporation under subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(6) A name that will become the record name of a domestic or foreign corporation upon a corporate instrument when there is a delayed effective or file date.

(c) The use by a corporation of a name in violation of this section may be enjoined notwithstanding the filing of its articles by the Secretary of State.

(d) Any applicant may, upon payment of the fee prescribed therefor in the Government Code, obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate of reservation of any name not prohibited by subdivision (b), and upon the issuance of the certificate the name stated therein shall be reserved for a period of 60 days. The Secretary of State shall not, however, issue certificates reserving the same name for two or more consecutive 60-day periods to the same applicant or for the use or benefit of the same person; nor shall consecutive reservations be made by or for the use or benefit of the same person of names so similar as to fall within the prohibitions of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 67.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Articles of Incorporation [9130. - 9134.]

9130.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under this part shall set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation.

(b) The following statement:

“This corporation is a religious corporation and is not organized for the private gain of any person. It is organized under the Nonprofit Religious Corporation Law (primarily or exclusively [insert one or both]) for religious purposes.” [The articles may include a further description of the corporation’s purpose.]
(c) The name and street
 address in this state of the corporation’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 6210 (made applicable pursuant to Section 9660).

(d) The initial street address of the corporation.

(e) The initial mailing address of the corporation, if different from the initial street address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 24.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9131.

The articles of incorporation may set forth a further statement limiting the purposes or powers of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9132.

(a) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions, which shall not be effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

(1) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a specified date.

(2) In the case of a subordinate corporation instituted or created under the authority of a head organization, a provision setting forth either or both of the following:

(A) That the subordinate corporation shall dissolve whenever its charter is surrendered to, taken away by, or revoked by the head organization granting it.

(B) That in the event of its dissolution pursuant to an article provision allowed by subparagraph (A) or in the event of its dissolution for any reason, any assets of the corporation after compliance with the applicable provisions
 of Chapters 16 (commencing with Section 6610) and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) (made applicable pursuant to Section 9680) shall be distributed to the head organization.

(b) Nothing contained in subdivision (a) shall affect the enforceability, as between the parties thereto, of any lawful agreement not otherwise contrary to public policy.

(c) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions:

(1) The names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(2) The classes of members, if any, and if there are two or more classes, the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions attaching to each class.

(3) A provision
 which would allow any member to have more or less than one vote in any election or other matter presented to the members for a vote.

(4) A provision that requires an amendment to the articles or to the bylaws, and any amendment or repeal of that amendment, to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board or the members. However, this approval requirement, unless the articles or the bylaws specify otherwise, shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(B) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(C) If the
 corporation has a specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been provided.

(5) Any other provision, not in conflict with law, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision which is required or permitted by this part to be stated in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 26.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9133.

For all purposes other than an action in the nature of quo warranto, a copy of the articles of a corporation duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the formation of the corporation and prima facie evidence of its corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9134.

If initial directors have not been named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators, until the directors are elected, may do whatever is necessary and proper to perfect the organization of the corporation, including the adoption and amendment of bylaws of the corporation and the election of directors and officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers [9140. - 9143.]

9140.

Subject to any limitations contained in the articles or bylaws and to compliance with other provisions of this division and any other applicable laws, a corporation, in carrying out its activities, shall have all of the powers of a natural person, including, without limitation, the power to:

(a) Adopt, use, and at will alter a corporate seal, but failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of any instrument.

(b) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws.

(c) Qualify to conduct its activities in any other state, territory, dependency, or foreign country.

(d) Issue, purchase, redeem, receive, take or
 otherwise acquire, own, sell, lend, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, pledge, use, and otherwise deal in and with its own bonds, debentures, notes, and debt securities.

(e) Issue memberships.

(f) Pay pensions, and establish and carry out pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of its directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to it or any of its subsidiary or related or associated corporations, and to indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any fiduciary of such plans, trusts, or provisions.

(g) Levy dues, assessments, and fees.

(h) Make donations for the public welfare or for community funds, hospital,
 charitable, educational, scientific, civic, religious, or similar purposes.

(i) Assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guarantee or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow or lend money or otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, or other encumbrance of all or any part of its property and income.

(j) Participate with others in any partnership, joint venture, or other association, transaction, or arrangement of any kind whether or not such participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others.

(k) Act as trustee under any trust incidental to the principal objects of the corporation, and receive, hold, administer, exchange, and expend funds and property subject to such trust.

(l) Carry on a business at a profit and apply any profit that results from the business activity to any activity in which it may lawfully engage.

(m) Pay the reasonable value of services rendered in this state to the corporation before January 1, 1975, and not previously paid, by any person who performed such services on a full-time basis under the direction of a religious organization in connection with the religious tenets of the organization. Such person shall have relied solely on the religious organization for their financial support for a minimum of five years. A payment shall not be made if such person or religious organization waives the payment or receipt of compensation for such services in writing. Payment may be made to such religious organization to reimburse it for maintenance of any person who rendered such services and to assist it in providing future support
 and maintenance; however, payment shall not be made from any funds or assets acquired with funds donated by or traceable to gifts made to the corporation by any person, organization, or governmental agency other than the members, immediate families of members, and affiliated religious organizations of the religious organization under whose direction the services were performed.

(n) (1) In anticipation of or during an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 9151:

(A) Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent resulting from the emergency.

(B) Relocate the principal office,
 designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(2) During an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 9151:

(A) Give notice to a director or directors in any practicable manner under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, by publication and radio, when notice of a meeting of the board cannot be given to that director or directors in the manner prescribed by the bylaws or Section 9211.

(B) Deem that one or more officers of the corporation present at a board meeting is a director, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum for that
 meeting.

(3) In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(4) Any actions taken in good faith in anticipation of or during an emergency under this subdivision bind the corporation and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency” means any of the following events or circumstances as a result of which, and only so long as, a quorum of the corporation’s board of directors cannot
 be readily convened for action:

(A) A natural catastrophe, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, epidemic, pandemic, or disease outbreak, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion.

(B) An attack on or within this state or on the public security of its residents by an enemy of this state or on the nation by an enemy of the United States of America, or upon receipt by this state of a warning from the federal government indicating that any such enemy attack is probable or imminent.

(C) An act of terrorism or other manmade disaster that results in extraordinary levels of casualties or damage or disruption severely affecting the infrastructure, environment, economy,
 government functions, or population, including, but not limited to, mass evacuations.

(D) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor of this state, including any person serving as Governor in accordance with Section 10 of Article V of the California Constitution and Section 12058 of the Government Code or by the President of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 15.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9141.

Subject to Section 9142:

(a) No limitation upon the activities, purposes, or powers of the corporation or upon the powers of the members, officers, or directors, or the manner of exercise of such powers, contained in or implied by the articles or by Chapters 16 (commencing with Section 6610), and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) (made applicable pursuant to Section 9680) shall be asserted as between the corporation or member, officer or director and any third person, except in a proceeding: (1) by the authorized number of members (Section 5036), by any person authorized by the articles or bylaws to bring an action, or by the state to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized activities by the corporation or its officers, or both, in cases where third parties have not acquired rights thereby, or (2) by the authorized number of members (Section 5036), by any person authorized by the articles or bylaws to bring an action, by any member suing in a representative suit, or by the corporation, against the officers or directors of the corporation for violation of their authority.

(b) Any contract or conveyance made in the name of a corporation which is authorized or ratified by the board or is done within the scope of authority, actual or apparent, conferred by the board or within the agency power of the officer executing it, except as the board’s authority is limited by law other than this part, binds the corporation, and the corporation acquires rights thereunder whether the contract is executed or wholly or in part executory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9142.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9141, any of the following may bring an action to enjoin, correct, obtain damages for or to otherwise remedy a breach of a trust under which any or all of the assets of a corporation are held:

(1) The corporation, a member, or a former member asserting the right in the name of the corporation, provided that for the purpose of this paragraph the provisions of Section 5710 shall apply to such action.

(2) An officer of the corporation.

(3) A director of the corporation.

(4) A person with a reversionary, contractual, or property interest in the assets subject to such trust.

(b) In an action under this section, the court may not rescind or enjoin the performance of a contract unless:

(1) All of the parties to the contract are parties to the action;

(2) No party to the contract has, in good faith and without actual notice of the restriction, parted with value under the contract or in reliance upon it; and

(3) It is equitable to do so.

(c) No assets of a religious corporation are or shall be deemed to be impressed with any trust, express or implied, statutory or at common law unless one of the following applies:

(1) Unless, and only to the extent that, the assets were received by the corporation with an express commitment by resolution of its board of directors to so hold those assets in trust.

(2) Unless, and only to the extent that, the articles or bylaws of the corporation, or the governing instruments of a superior religious body or general church of which the corporation is a member, so expressly provide.

(3) Unless, and only to the extent that, the donor expressly imposed a trust, in writing, at the time of the gift or donation.

(d) Trusts created by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be amended or dissolved by amendment from time to time to the articles, bylaws, or governing instruments creating the trusts. However, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit the amendment of the articles to delete or to amend provisions required by Section 214.01 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to a greater extent than otherwise allowable by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9143.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, when property, received by a corporation, covered by this part from a person directly affiliated with that corporation has been contributed based upon an affirmative representation that it would be used for a specific purpose other than the general support of the corporation’s activities and has been used in a manner contrary to the specific purpose for which the property was contributed, an action may be brought by the contributor or by any person listed in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 9142, if that person, before bringing an action, notifies the corporation, in writing, that an action will be brought unless the corporation takes immediate steps to correct any improper diversion of funds.

(b) In the event that it becomes impractical or impossible for the corporation to devote the property to the specific purpose for which it was contributed, or that the directors or members of the corporation in good faith expressly conclude and record in writing that the stated purpose for which the property was contributed is no longer in accord with the policies or best interests of the corporation, the directors or members of the corporation may, in good faith, approve or ratify the use of the property for the general purposes of the corporation rather than for the specific purpose for which it was contributed.

(c) A public officer may not bring an action in an official capacity under this section even on behalf of a private person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [9150. - 9153.]

9150.

(a) “Bylaws,” as used in this part means the code or codes of rules used, adopted, or recognized for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated.

(b) Bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed as provided in the articles or bylaws and absent any provision, bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by approval of the members (Section 5034) or the board, except as provided in subdivision (c). The articles or bylaws may restrict or eliminate the power of the board to adopt, amend or repeal any or all bylaws subject to subdivision (e) of Section 9151.

(c) Subject to any provision in the articles or bylaws, the power of the board to adopt, amend or repeal bylaws is subject to the powers of members set forth in Section 9151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

9151.

(a) The bylaws shall set forth (unless such provision is contained in the articles, in which case it may only be changed by an amendment of the articles) the number of directors of the corporation, or the method of determining the number of directors of the corporation, or that the number of directors shall be not less than a stated minimum nor more than a stated maximum with the exact number of directors to be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board or the members (Section 5034), in the manner provided in the bylaws, subject to subdivision (e) of Section 9151. The number or minimum number of directors may be one or more.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, once members have been admitted, a bylaw specifying or changing a
 fixed number of directors or the maximum or minimum number or changing from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa may only be adopted by approval of the members (Section 5034).

(c) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with law or the articles, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including, but not limited to:

(1) Any provision referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 9132.

(2) The time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of members’, directors’, and committee meetings, or of conducting mail ballots.

(3) The qualifications, duties, and compensation of directors; the time of their election; and the requirements of a quorum for directors’ and committee
 meetings.

(4) The appointment of committees, composed of directors or nondirectors, or both, by the board or any officer and the authority of any such committees.

(5) The appointment, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers.

(6) The mode of determination of members of record.

(7) The making of reports and financial statements to members.

(8) Setting, imposing, and collecting dues, assessments, and admissions and transfer fees.

(d) The bylaws may provide for the manner of admission, withdrawal, suspension, and expulsion of members.

(e) The bylaws may
 require, for any or all corporate actions (except as provided in Section 9222 and subdivision (b) of Section 9680), the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the members or the members of any class, unit, or grouping of members, or the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the directors than is otherwise required by this part. Such a provision in the bylaws requiring such greater vote shall not be altered, amended, or repealed except by such greater vote, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws.

(f) The bylaws may contain a provision limiting the number of members, in total or of any class, which the corporation is authorized to admit.
